Hawaii statutes.
§195F-4 Forest stewardship fund. (a)
There is established a special fund within the state treasury known as the
forest stewardship fund which shall be used as follows:

(1) Payments shall be made by the board pursuant to
agreements entered into with qualified landowners to further the purposes of
this chapter; and

(2) Moneys collected from:

(A) The harvest of non-native forest products
from forest reserves;

(B) The harvest of native forest products
from degraded forests as defined in section 186-5.5, within forest reserves;

(C) The sale of forest products found dead
and lying on the ground;

(D) The sale of tree seedlings from state
nurseries;

(E) The sale of any other products or
services, or anything of value derived from forest reserves not described
above; or

(F) The imposition of fines or penalties for
violations of this chapter and chapters 183 and 185 or any rule adopted
thereunder;

shall be used for: (i) replanting,
managing, and maintaining designated timber management areas; (ii) enhancing
the management of public forest reserves with an emphasis on restoring degraded
koa forests; and (iii) developing environmental education and training programs
pertaining to sustainable forestry; provided that the activities described in
clauses (ii) and (iii) may not be funded unless the activities described in
approved management plans pertaining to clause (i) are adequately funded.

(b) The fund shall consist of moneys received
from any public or private sources. The fund shall be held separate and apart
from all other moneys, funds, and accounts in the state treasury; provided that
any moneys received from the federal government or from private contributions
shall be deposited and accounted for in accordance with conditions established
by the agencies or persons from whom the moneys are received.

Investment earnings credited to the fund shall
become a part of the assets of the fund. Any balance remaining in the fund at
the end of any fiscal year shall be carried forward in the fund for the next
fiscal year. [L 1991, c 327, pt of §2; am L 1999, c 144, §4; am L 2001, c 152,
§1; am L 2006, c 174, §5; am L 2007, c 9, §9; am L 2015, c 84, §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next